District of Columbia statutes.
26-1306

Charter of incorporation — Notice of application.

Previous to the presentation of the said certificate to the said Council of the District of Columbia, notice of the intention to apply for such charter shall be inserted in 2 newspapers of general circulation, printed in the District of Columbia, at least 4 times a week for 3 weeks, setting forth briefly the name of the proposed company, its character and object, the names of the proposed corporators, and the intention to make application for a charter on a specified day; and the proof of such publication shall be presented with said certificate when presentation thereof is made to said Council.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1303, ch. 854, § 718
1981 Ed., § 26-406.
1973 Ed., § 26-306.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(223) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.